Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1407.02
Sales tax permit; authorized use;
violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person
holding a Nebraska sales tax permit, except a dealer licensed pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation
Act, to sell or offer for sale any motor vehicle, motorcycle,
or trailer, not owned by such person, on the premises covered by such sales
tax permit. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 15;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 93;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 62.